test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-puhm38_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - puhm: # Noun (38) puhm 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom: puhm
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen: puhma
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Par: puhma
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill: puhma
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Ine: [puhman, puhmah, puhmahn]
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Ela: puhmast
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+All: puhmalõ
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Ade: puhmal
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Abl: puhmalt
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Tra: puhmas
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Ter: puhmaniq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe: puhmaldaq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Sg+Com: puhmagaq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom: puhmaq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen: puhmõ
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Par: puhmõ
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill: [puhmõhe, puhmõ, puhmõdõ]
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Ine: [puhmõn, puhmõh, puhmõhn]
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Ela: puhmõst
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+All: puhmõlõ
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Ade: puhmõl
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Abl: puhmõlt
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Tra: puhmõs
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Ter: puhmõniq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe: puhmõldaq
    puhm+Hom1+N+Pl+Com: puhmõgaq
